Utah statutes.
70A-8-107.   Warranties in direct holding.
(1)  A person who transfers a certificated security to a purchaser for value
warrants to the purchaser, and an indorser, if the transfer is by indorsement,
warrants to any subsequent purchaser, that:
(a)  the certificate is genuine and has not been materially altered;
(b)  the transferor or indorser does not know of any fact that might impair
the validity of the security;
(c)  there is no adverse claim to the security;
(d)  the transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer;
(e)  if the transfer is by indorsement, the indorsement is made by an
appropriate person, or if the indorsement is by an agent, the agent has actual
authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person; and
(f)  the transfer is otherwise effective and rightful.
(2)  A person who originates an instruction for registration of transfer of an
uncertificated security to a purchaser for value warrants to the purchaser
that:
(a)  the instruction is made by an appropriate person, or if the instruction
is by an agent, the agent has actual authority to act on behalf of the
appropriate person;
(b)  the security is valid;
(c)  there is no adverse claim to the security; and
(d)  at the time the instruction is presented to the issuer:
(i)  the purchaser will be entitled to the registration of transfer;
(ii)  the transfer will be registered by the issuer free from all liens,
security interests, restrictions, and claims other than those specified in the
instruction;
(iii)  the transfer will not violate any restriction on transfer; and
(iv)  the requested transfer will otherwise be effective and rightful.
(3)  A person who transfers an uncertificated security to a purchaser for
value and does not originate an instruction in connection with the transfer
warrants that:
(a)  the uncertificated security is valid;
(b)  there is no adverse claim to the security;
(c)  the transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer; and
(d)  the transfer is otherwise effective and rightful.
(4)  A person who indorses a security certificate warrants to the issuer that:
(a)  there is no adverse claim to the security; and
(b)  the indorsement is effective.
(5)  A person who originates an instruction for registration of transfer of an
uncertificated security warrants to the issuer that:
(a)  the instruction is effective; and
(b)  at the time the instruction is presented to the issuer the purchaser will
be entitled to the registration of transfer.
(6)  A person who presents a certificated security for registration of
transfer or for payment or exchange warrants to the issuer that the person is
entitled to the registration, payment, or exchange, but a purchaser for value
and without notice of adverse claims to whom transfer is registered warrants
only that the person has no knowledge of any unauthorized signature in a
necessary indorsement.
(7)  If a person acts as agent of another in delivering a certificated
security to a purchaser, the identity of the principal was known to the person
to whom the certificate was delivered, and the certificate delivered by the
agent was received by the agent from the principal or received by the agent
from another person at the direction of the principal, the person delivering
the security certificate warrants only that the delivering person has
authority to act for the principal and does not know of any adverse claim to
the certificated security.
(8)  A secured party who redelivers a security certificate received, or after
payment and on order of the debtor delivers the security certificate to
another person, makes only the warranties of an agent under Subsection (7).
(9)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (7), a broker acting for a
customer makes to the issuer and a purchaser the warranties provided in
Subsections (1) through (6).  A broker that delivers a security certificate to
its customer, or causes its customer to be registered as the owner of an
uncertificated security, makes to the customer the warranties provided in
Subsection (1) or (2), and has the rights and privileges of a purchaser under
this section.  The warranties of and in favor of the broker acting as an agent
are in addition to applicable warranties given by and in favor of the
customer.
